Vermont, session 2025-2026, S137.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE AND INTENT
(a) Purpose. This act provides an option for voters to choose “None of
these candidates” on primary and general election ballots and establishes that a
vote for “None of these candidates” is specifically counted as a vote for none
of the listed candidates and not as a blank vote.
VT LEG #379866 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.137
2025 Page 2 of 6
(b) Intent. After the option to choose “None of these candidates” is enacted
into law, the General Assembly intends to amend Rule 10(c) of the Joint Rules
of the Senate and House of Representatives so that a vote for “None of these
candidates” on a general election ballot is specifically counted as such and not
as a blank vote when determining whether a candidate for Governor,
Lieutenant Governor, or Treasurer received a major part of the votes in
accordance with Chapter II, § 47 of the Vermont Constitution.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2362 is amended to read:
§ 2362. PRIMARY BALLOTS
(a) A separate ballot for each major political party shall be printed and
furnished to the towns by the Secretary of State and shall contain the names of
all candidates for nomination by that party at the primary. Ballots shall be
printed on index stock and configured to be readable by vote tabulators.
Ballots shall be printed in substantially the following form:
OFFICIAL VERMONT PRIMARY ELECTION BALLOT
VOTE ON ONE PARTY BALLOT ONLY AND PLACE IN BALLOT
BOX OR VOTE TABULATOR
ALL OTHER PARTY BALLOTS MUST BE PLACED IN UNVOTED
BALLOT BOX
________________________
VT LEG #379866 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.137
2025 Page 3 of 6
[MAJOR POLITICAL PARTY NAME]
________________________
Instructions to voters: Use black pen or pencil to fill in the oval. To
vote for a person whose name is printed on the ballot, fill in the oval to the
right of the name of that person. To vote for a person whose name is not
printed on the ballot, write or stick his or her the person’s name in the blank
space provided and fill in the oval to the right of the write-in space. Do not
vote for more candidates than the “Vote for Not More Than” number for an
office. You may also choose “None of these candidates” if you do not want to
vote for any candidate. If you make a mistake, tear, or deface the ballot, return
it to an election official and obtain another ballot. Do not erase.
(b)(1) Following the names of candidates printed on the ballot after the
name of each office to be filled shall be:
(A) an option for a voter to choose “None of these candidates”; and
(B) as many blank lines for write-in candidates as there are persons to
be elected to that office.
(2) If no primary petition is filed for an office or for a candidate
belonging to a party, the ballot shall contain the name of the office and blank
lines for write-in candidates.
VT LEG #379866 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.137
2025 Page 4 of 6
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. § 2472 is amended to read:
§ 2472. CONTENTS
(a)(1) The ballot shall be titled “OFFICIAL VERMONT GENERAL
ELECTION BALLOT,” followed by the date of the election. Immediately
below, the following instructions shall be printed: “Instruction to Voters: To
vote for a candidate whose name is printed on the ballot, fill in the oval at the
right of that person’s name and party designation. To vote for a candidate
whose name is not printed on the ballot, write the person’s name on the blank
line in the appropriate block and fill in the oval to the right of that blank line.
When there are two or more candidates to be elected to one office, you may
vote for any number of candidates up to and including the maximum number.”
You may also fill in the oval to the right of “None of these candidates” if you
do not want to vote for any candidate.”
(2) The name of the town or towns and legislative district in which the
ballot is to be used shall be listed in the upper left hand corner.
(b)(1) Each office to be voted upon shall be separately indicated and
preceded by the word “For,” as: “For United States Senator.” Beneath the
office to be voted upon shall appear the instructions: “Vote for not more than
(the number of candidates to be elected).”
(2)(A) The names of the candidates for each office shall be listed in
alphabetical order by surname, followed by the candidate’s town of residence,
VT LEG #379866 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.137
2025 Page 5 of 6
and the party or parties by which the candidate has been nominated, or in the
case of independent candidates who have not chosen some other name or
identification, by the word “Independent.”
(B) The word “party” shall not be printed on the ballot following a
candidate’s party name.
* * *
(c) Following the names of candidates for each office, there shall be as:
(1) An option for a voter to choose “None of these candidates” and an
oval to the right of that option that is identical to the ovals that follow the
candidates’ names.
(2) As many blank write-in lines as there are persons to be elected to
that office. To the right of each such line shall be the words “Write-In” and an
oval identical to the ovals that follow the candidates’ names. Lines provided
for writing in names for President and Vice President shall be separately
designated by the words “President” and “Vice President.”
* * *
Sec. 4. 17 V.S.A. § 2587 is amended to read:
§ 2587. RULES FOR COUNTING VOTES
* * *
(b) If the voter marks more names than there are persons to be elected to an
office, marks a name and “None of these candidates,” or marks contradictory
VT LEG #379866 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.137
2025 Page 6 of 6
sides on any public question, overvotes equal to the number of candidates to be
elected to the office must shall be recorded on the tally sheet for that office or
question.
(c)(1) A write-in vote for a candidate whose name is preprinted on the
ballot shall be counted as a vote for that candidate.
* * *
(3) A vote for “None of these candidates” shall be counted as a vote for
none of the listed candidates, have the same significance as a vote for a
candidate, and be recorded on the tally sheet for that office.
* * *
(f) When the same number of persons are nominated for the position of
justice of the peace as there are positions to be filled, the presiding officer may
declare the whole slate of candidates elected without making individual tallies,
providing provided that each person on the slate has more votes than the
largest number of write-in votes for any one candidate.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379866 v.1